District of Columbia statutes.
24-251.05

Records and reports.

(a)

Residents being released on furlough shall be reported as “furloughed” on appropriate Departmental records and statistical forms, identifying such movement as a furlough. Because time spent on furlough is creditable toward the service of a sentence, such status will not preclude the earning of good time or pay.

(b)

Each caseworker or counselor assigned to handle a furloughed resident will, upon the completion of each such furlough, prepare a brief report to include:

(1)

The name and Department number of the furloughed resident to whom the report relates;

(2)

The purpose of the furlough being completed;

(3)

A statement of the results of the furlough, including an explanation of any unusual circumstances or events;

(4)

The reporter’s assessment of the circumstances or events in relation to the resident’s correctional goals; and

(5)

The dates of any previous furloughs granted, including the one to which the report relates.

(c)

Copies of all executed furlough release authorization forms shall be kept in the office of the Administrator. Within 5 calendar days before the beginning of each month, the information on these forms (in digested form) will be reported to the designee of the Director. These reports will include:

(1)

The name and Department number of each resident who has been granted a furlough during the reporting period;

(2)

Sentence data relating to such resident, including his earliest release date;

(3)

The purpose of the furlough;

(4)

The beginning and ending dates of the furlough;

(5)

The name of the officer authorizing the furlough;

(6)

The number of furloughs previously granted to such resident; and

(7)

The total number of furloughs granted to all residents during the reporting period.

History

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-130, § 6, 23 DCR 9694

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 24-485.
1973 Ed., § 24-485.